Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1604
Adverse consequences, defined.

Adverse consequences means negative impacts that may occur upstream, downstream, or at locations remote from the dam, including, but not limited to, loss of human life, economic loss including property damage, and lifeline disruption.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 4.